Hawaii, session 2025, HB1475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $67,824,750 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the thirty-seventh representative district, as follows: 1.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction for a new visitor center to provide a safe, functional, and welcoming space for family members visiting inmates, replacing the current makeshift facility, which is a modified shipping container. Design                         $150,000 Construction                 $1,500,000 Total funding                     $1,650,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 2.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction for critical facility wastewater system improvements to resolve ongoing sewage backups, accommodate increased flow capacity, and install modern monitoring systems to enhance operational efficiency and reliability. Design                         $400,000 Construction                 $4,000,000 Total funding                     $4,400,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 3.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction to improve the facility laundry room by addressing non-functional dryers that currently necessitate transporting laundry to Halawa five days a week, including the installation of commercial-grade washers and dryers, along with necessary appurtenances, to enhance efficiency and meet the facility's operational needs. Design                          $55,000 Construction                   $550,000 Total funding                       $605,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 4.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction to remove and replace boilers in inmate housing units for Buildings 4, 5, 6, 9, and 10, addressing the lack of hot water for showers after work programs and ensuring a functional and reliable hot water supply, including necessary appurtenances. Design                          $40,000 Construction                   $400,000 Total funding                       $440,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 5.   Waiawa correctional facility Design and construction to replace the roofs and gutters of Buildings 9 and 10, addressing persistent leaking issues and ensuring long-term durability as the existing roofs have exceeded their 20-year life cycle. Design                          $50,000 Construction                   $500,000 Total funding                       $550,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation. 6.   Kanoelani elementary school Design and construction to replace outdated campus fire alarm systems, including the installation of a new system monitoring infrastructure, to enhance safety and ensure compliance with modern fire safety standards. Design                         $500,000 Equipment                    $2,000,000 Total funding                     $2,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 7.   Kanoelani elementary school Design and construction to reroof Building G, addressing wear and tear and ensuring protection from weather-related damage Design                          $25,000 Construction                   $250,000 Total funding                       $275,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 8.   Kanoelani elementary school Design and construction to reroof the administration building, addressing wear and tear and ensuring protection from weather-related damage. Design                           $8,750 Construction                    $87,500 Total funding                        $96,250 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 9.   Kipapa elementary school Construction to implement various ADA-compliance improvements across the campus, including appurtenances, ensuring accessibility and inclusivity for all students, staff, and visitors. Construction                   $900,000 Total funding                       $900,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 10.  Kipapa elementary school Design and construction to replace and install ceiling fans throughout campus. Design                          $18,000 Construction                   $180,000 Total funding                       $198,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 11.  Kipapa elementary school Design and construction to replace outdated campus fire alarm systems, including the installation of a new system monitoring infrastructure, to enhance safety and ensure compliance with modern fire safety standards. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                     $2,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 12.  Kipapa elementary school Design and construction to replace the roofs of classrooms P-12 and P-13, addressing weather-related wear and tear to ensure a safe and functional learning environment for students and staff. Design                           $4,500 Construction                    $45,000 Total funding                        $49,500 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 13.  Mililani high school Design and construction to remove and replace aging portable classrooms with permanent modular buildings designed for 21st-century learning. Design                         $700,000 Construction                 $7,000,000 Total funding                     $7,700,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 14.  Mililani Mauka elementary school Design and construction to replace aging and inefficient air conditioning equipment in Building A, improving energy efficiency and ensuring a comfortable learning environment for students and staff. Design                          $90,000 Construction                   $900,000 Total funding                       $990,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 15.  Mililani Mauka elementary school Design and construction to replace outdated campus fire alarm systems, including the installation of a new system monitoring infrastructure, to enhance safety and ensure compliance with modern fire safety standards. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                     $2,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 16.  Mililani middle school Design and construction for an AgTech classroom, storage facilities, and parking, supporting the integration of agricultural technology into the curriculum and providing necessary infrastructure for student learning and activities. Design                         $600,000 Construction                 $5,400,000 Total funding                     $6,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 17.  Mililani middle school Design and construction to repair and resurface the deteriorating bus lanes and access road surfaces, improving safety and usability for students, staff, and vehicles accessing the campus. Design                         $100,000 Construction                 $1,400,000 Total funding                     $1,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 18.  Mililani middle school Design and construction to replace the leaking roof, gutters, and soffits of Building E, addressing long-standing water damage and ensuring the building's structural integrity and functionality. Design                         $100,000 Construction                   $900,000 Total funding                     $1,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 19.  Mililani middle school Design and construction to widen the sidewalks near Buildings F, G, and H to meet ADA standards, create passing spaces, and accommodate increased pedestrian traffic from the new Building J. Design                          $50,000 Construction                   $700,000 Total funding                       $750,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 20.  Mililani Uka elementary school Construction to implement various ADA-compliance improvements across the campus, including appurtenances, ensuring accessibility and inclusivity for all students, staff, and visitors. Construction                 $4,400,000 Total funding                     $4,400,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 21.  Mililani Uka elementary school Design and construction to reroof classrooms P-6, P-7, and P-12, addressing wear and tear and ensuring protection from weather-related damage. Design                          $10,000 Construction                   $100,000 Total funding                       $110,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 22.  Mililani Waena elementary school Design and construction to remove and replace outdated kindergarten playground equipment with new structures, install synthetic turf surfacing for safety and durability, and provide shade structures to enhance the play environment for students. Design                          $25,000 Construction                   $250,000 Total funding                       $275,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 23.  Mililani Waena elementary school Design and construction to replace outdated campus fire alarm systems, including the installation of a new system monitoring infrastructure, to enhance safety and ensure compliance with modern fire safety standards. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                     $2,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 24.  school facilities authority Construction costs to relocate the proposed Mililani high school teacher workforce housing project from site A to site B in response to community feedback, addressing the significant site grading and infrastructure development required to prepare the new location for housing construction. Construction                $10,806,000 Total funding                    $10,806,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 25.  Kamehameha highway Plans, design, and construction for a barrier and signage along Kamehameha highway near the Kipapa gulch bridge to enhance public safety, prevent unauthorized encampments, and ensure unobstructed access to the highway. Plans                          $150,000 Design                         $300,000 Construction                 $1,400,000 Total funding                     $1,850,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 26.  Kamehameha highway Plans, design, and construction to resurface Kamehameha highway from Waipahu street to Ka Uka boulevard to address poor and cracking pavement conditions, ensuring improved safety and roadway durability. Plans                          $300,000 Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $6,000,000 Total funding                     $6,800,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of transportation. 27.  university of Hawaii - west Oahu Design and construction for a plaza and central pathways to connect the university of Hawaii - west Oahu to the Keoneae rail station, providing ADA-compliant access and fostering safe, efficient, and inclusive connectivity for students, faculty, and visitors. Design                         $350,000 Construction                 $3,500,000 Total funding                     $3,850,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the university of Hawaii. 28.  university of Hawaii - west Oahu Design and construction for improvements to the exterior opening doors and the installation of additional CCTV systems at the university of Hawaii - west Oahu to enhance campus safety; improve security measures along pathways to the rail station; and provide a safer environment for students, faculty, and visitors. Design                          $30,000 Construction                   $400,000 Total funding                       $430,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the university of Hawaii. 29.  university of Hawaii - west Oahu Design and construction to repair and reseal the exterior glass tower of the university of Hawaii - west Oahu library to address persistent water leakage issues; protect the building's structural integrity; and ensure a safe and comfortable environment for students, faculty, and visitors. Design                         $200,000 Construction                 $2,000,000 Total funding                     $2,200,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the university of Hawaii. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________